Tennessee, session 114, SB1233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-202(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "report the offense to" and substituting "report the offense in writing to".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1233
003285
- 1 -